Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1098.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 484.44, is amended to read: 484.44 DEPUTY SHERIFF AND COURT ADMINISTRATOR; ST. LOUIS COUNTY. There shall be at all times a chief deputy sheriff of St. Louis County and a chief deputy court administrator of the district court of St. Louis County and such other deputies as may be necessary, resident at the city of Virginia, or the city of Ely, or the city of Hibbing, and their appointment shall be made in the same manner as other deputy sheriffs and deputy clerks of the district court in said county. The salaries of such deputies shall be fixed and paid in the same manner as other such deputies. The office of said deputy sheriff at Virginia, Hibbing, and Ely shall not in any sense be considered or deemed the office of the sheriff for any purpose except the performance of duties relating solely to proceedings tried or to be tried at said places; but the office of the deputy court administrator at said places shall be equally deemed the office of the court administrator of court for all purposes deleted text begin except the filing of papers in actions or proceedings to be tried at Duluthdeleted text end . Marriage licenses and naturalization papers may be issued by said deputy court administrator. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 484.51, is amended to read: 484.51 PAPERS WHERE FILED; ST. LOUIS COUNTY. deleted text begin Afterdeleted text end new text begin Regardless ofnew text end the place of trial of any cause deleted text begin is determineddeleted text end , as provided in sections 484.44 to 484.52, all papers, orders and documents pertaining to all causes deleted text begin to be tried at Virginia and filed in court shall be filed and be kept on file at the court administrator's office in the city of Virginia, and all causes to be tried in Hibbing and all papers, orders and documents pertaining thereto shall be filed and be kept on file at the court administrator's office in the city of Hibbingdeleted text end new text begin can be filed at any court location in St. Louis Countynew text end . In all actions tried at the city of Virginia or the city of Hibbing, the court administrator, as soon as final judgment is entered, shall forthwith cause such judgment to be docketed in the court administrator's office at the county seat; and when so docketed the same shall become a lien on real estate and have the same effect as judgments entered in causes tried at the county seat. In all actions tried at the city of Virginia or the city of Hibbing, involving the title of real estate, upon final judgment being entered, all the papers in said cause shall be filed in the court administrator's office at the county seat and the final judgment or decree recorded therein, and a certified copy of all papers in the case shall be made by the court administrator and retained at the court administrator's office in the city of Virginia or in the court administrator's office in the city of Hibbing where the action was originally tried, without additional charge to the parties to said action. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 518.68, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Requirement. Every court order or judgment and decree under this chapter or chapter 518A that provides for child support, spousal maintenance, custody, or parenting time must contain certain notices as set out in subdivision 2. The information in the notices must be concisely stated in plain languagedeleted text begin . The notices must bedeleted text end new text begin andnew text end in clearly legible printdeleted text begin , but may not exceed two pagesdeleted text end . An order or judgment and decree without the notice remains subject to all statutes. The court may waive all or part of the notice required under subdivision 2 relating to parental rights under section 518.17, subdivision 3, if it finds it is necessary to protect the welfare of a party or child. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 524.5-420, is amended to read: 524.5-420 REPORTS; APPOINTMENT OF VISITOR; MONITORING; COURT ORDERS. (a) A conservator shall report to the court for administration of the estate annually unless the court otherwise directs, upon resignation or removal, upon termination of the conservatorship, and at other times as the court directs. new text begin A copy of the report must be provided to the person subject to conservatorship and to interested persons of record with the court. new text end An order, after notice and hearing, allowing an intermediate report of a conservator adjudicates liabilities concerning the matters adequately disclosed in the accounting. An order, after notice and hearing, allowing a final report adjudicates all previously unsettled liabilities relating to the conservatorship. (b) A report must state or contain a listing of the assets of the estate under the conservator's control and a listing of the receipts, disbursements, and distributions during the reporting period. (c) The report must also state an address or post office box and a telephone number where the conservator can be contacted. (d) A conservator shall report to the court in writing within 30 days of the occurrence of any of the events listed in this paragraph. The conservator must report any of the occurrences in this paragraph and follow the same reporting requirements in this paragraph for any employee of the conservator responsible for exercising powers and duties under the conservatorship. A copy of the report must be provided to the person subject to conservatorship and to interested persons of record with the court. A conservator shall report when: (1) the conservator is removed for cause from serving as a guardian or conservator, and if so, the case number and court location; (2) the conservator has a professional license from an agency listed under section 524.5-118, subdivision 2a, denied, conditioned, suspended, revoked, or canceled, and if so, the licensing agency and license number, and the basis for denial, condition, suspension, revocation, or cancellation of the license; (3) the conservator is found civilly liable in an action that involves fraud, misrepresentation, material omission, misappropriation, theft, or conversion, and if so, the case number and court location; (4) the conservator files for or receives protection under the bankruptcy laws, and if so, the case number and court location; (5) a civil monetary judgment is entered against the conservator, and if so, the case number, court location, and outstanding amount owed; (6) the conservator is convicted of a crime other than a petty misdemeanor or traffic offense, and if so, the case number and court location; or (7) an order for protection or harassment restraining order is issued against the conservator, and if so, the case number and court location. (e) A person subject to conservatorship or an interested person of record with the court may submit to the court a written statement disputing account statements regarding the administration of the estate or addressing any disciplinary or legal action that is contained in the reports and may petition the court for any order that is in the best interests of the person subject to conservatorship and the estate or for other appropriate relief. (f) An interested person may notify the court in writing that the interested person does not wish to receive copies of reports required under this section after which time neither the court nor any other person is required to give notice to any person who has waived notice. (g) The court may appoint a visitor to review a report or plan, interview the person subject to conservatorship or conservator, and make any other investigation the court directs. In connection with a report, the court may order a conservator to submit the assets of the estate to an appropriate examination to be made in a manner the court directs. (h) The court shall establish a system for monitoring of conservatorships, including the filing and review of conservators' reports and plans. If an annual report is not filed within 60 days of the required date, the court shall issue an order to show cause. Unless otherwise ordered by the court, a report under this section shall be filed publicly. (i) If there is no acting guardian, a conservator that becomes aware of the death of the person subject to conservatorship shall notify in writing; orally; or by phone, text message, email, or electronic service, all known interested persons as defined by section 524.5-102, subdivision 7, clauses (iii), (iv), (v), (vi), (ix), and (xi), and the court as soon as is reasonably practical, that the person subject to conservatorship has died. The conservator may delegate this task under reasonable circumstances. (j) If a conservator fails to comply with this section, the court may decline to appoint that person as a guardian or conservator, or may remove a person as guardian or conservator. Sec. 5. new text begin JUDICIARY APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Supreme court. new text end new text begin (a) $3,019,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $6,168,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the supreme court to maintain core justice operations. new text end new text begin (b) $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the supreme court to improve systems, processes, and procedures necessary to provide access to court information for justice partners. The base for this purpose is $400,000 in fiscal year 2028 and $400,000 in fiscal year 2029. new text end new text begin (c) $2,550,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $2,550,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the supreme court for digital accessibility. The base for this purpose is $882,000 in fiscal year 2028 and $882,000 in fiscal year 2029. new text end new text begin (d) The base funding is $1,750,000 in fiscal year 2028 and $1,750,000 in fiscal year 2029 to secure permanent funding for ongoing cyber security costs. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Court of appeals. new text end new text begin $902,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,852,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the supreme court for the court of appeals to maintain core justice operations. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin District courts. new text end new text begin (a) $21,182,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $44,178,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the supreme court for district courts to maintain core justice operations. new text end new text begin (b) $3,611,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $3,611,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the supreme court for district courts to increase the hourly rate paid to forensic examiners. new text end new text begin (c) $9,224,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $9,224,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the supreme court for district courts to increase juror per diem and mileage rates. new text end new text begin (d) The base funding is $5,317,000 in fiscal year 2028 and $5,317,000 in fiscal year 2029 to provide permanent funding for statutorily mandated psychological services. new text end new text begin (e) The base funding is $1,290,000 in fiscal year 2028 and $1,290,000 in fiscal year 2029 to provide permanent funding for statutorily mandated interpreter services. new text end new text begin (f) The base funding is $788,000 in fiscal year 2028 and $788,000 in fiscal year 2029 to provide permanent funding for statutorily mandated jury services. new text end